Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 26 Special Commission on Criminal Justice

12-26-1.
Special commission on criminal justice established.

There is created a commission to be known as the special commission on criminal justice. The commission shall consist of nineteen (19) members: three (3) of whom shall be from the house of representatives, not more than two (2) of whom shall be from the same political party, to be appointed by the speaker; three (3) of whom shall be from the senate, not more than two (2) of whom shall be from the same political party, to be appointed by the president of the senate; eight (8) of whom shall be the chief justice of the supreme court, the presiding justice of the superior court, the chief judge of the family court, the chief judge of the district court, the attorney general, the public defender, the mental health advocate, and the state court administrator, all of whom shall serve ex officio; one of whom shall be a member of the bar association who has experience in criminal practice to be appointed by the governor; four (4) of whom shall be representative of the public to be appointed by the governor and to serve for terms of two (2) years. All ex officio members shall have the right to vote on all matters which are considered by the commission.

Vacancies on the commission shall be filled in like manner as the original appointment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 113, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 12.

12-26-2.
Purpose.

The purpose of the commission established by this chapter shall be to develop and implement, on a continuing basis, standards and priorities designed to accomplish the comprehensive and orderly reform of the criminal justice system, and to make recommendations to both the general assembly and the courts for the improvement of the criminal justice system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 113, § 1.

12-26-3.
Organization.

The members of the commission shall meet at the call of the speaker of the house of representatives and organize and shall select a chairperson from among themselves.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 113, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 19.

12-26-4.
Duties.

The duties of the commission shall include:

Completion and publication of a comparative analysis of Rhode Island’s criminal procedures and practices with those standards for criminal justice recommended by the American Bar Association and by the President’s National Advisory Commission on Criminal Justice Standards and Goals;

Conducting a study for the purpose of revising the statutes relating to crimes and punishments;

Conducting a study of sentencing criteria and procedures;

Reviewing court organization;

Developing a comprehensive strategy to resolve problems encountered in the administration of criminal justice;

Studying any matter relating to the criminal justice system deemed worthy by the commission; and

Recommending legislation and rules of court for the improvement of criminal justice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 113, § 1.

12-26-5.
Annual report.

The commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the general assembly annually, on or before April 1 of each year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 113, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 19.

12-26-6.
Compensation — Clerical assistance — Cooperation of departments and agencies — Quarters.

The membership of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be allowed their travel and necessary expenses.

The commission may engage any clerical, technical, and other assistance that it may deem necessary, and spend other funds to accomplish its purpose.

All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish any advice and information, documentary and otherwise, to the commission and its agents that is deemed necessary or desirable by the commission to facilitate the purposes of this chapter.

The director of administration is authorized and directed to provide suitable quarters for the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 113, § 1.